bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Делтапланеризъм и скачане с парашут > Въздушни костюми: Гащеризони за скачане с парашут; Уингсют
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Hanggliding og faldskærmsudspring > Flyvedragt: Springdragter til faldskærmsudspring; Wingsuits
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Sárkányrepülés és ejtőernyős ugrás > Légruhák: Ejtőernyős ugróruhák; Wingsuitok
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ハンググライダー・スカイダイビング > エアスーツ: スカイダイビング用ジャンプスーツ; ウィングスーツ
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hanggliding og fallskjermhopping > Luftdrakter: Hoppdresser for fallskjermhopping; Vingedresser
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Letenje zmajem i padobranom > Zračna odijela: Padobranski kombinezoni; Odijela s krilima
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hang Gliding & Skydiving > Air Suits: Skydiving Jumpsuits; Wingsuits
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Sklandymas ir parašiutizmas > Kombinezonai: Parašiutininkų kombinezonai; Skraidymo kostiumai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Paralotniarstwo i spadochroniarstwo > Kostiumy powietrzne: Kombinezony spadochronowe; Kombinezony wingsuit
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Yelken Kanat ve Serbest Paraşüt > Uçuş Giysileri: Serbest düşüş tulumları; Wingsuit'ler
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Αιωροπτερισμός & ελεύθερη πτώση > Αεροστολές: Φόρμες ελεύθερης πτώσης; Στολές wingsuit
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Asa-delta e paraquedismo > Fatos de queda-livre: Fatos de paraquedismo; Fatos planadores
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Deltaplane și parașutism > Combinezoane: Combinezoane pentru parașutism; Costume wingsuit
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Asa-delta e paraquedismo > Uniformes de voo livre: Macacões de paraquedismo; Wingsuits
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Dù lượn và nhảy dù > Bộ liền một mảnh chuyên dụng cho các môn thể thao trên không: Bộ đồ nhảy dù; Bộ đồ bay wingsuit
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Flygsport > Flygdräkter: Hoppdräkter för fallskärmshoppning; Vingdräkter
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Hanggliding en skydiving > Vliegpakken: Skydivingjumpsuits; Wingsuits
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Závesné lietanie a parašutizmus > Kombinézy na lietanie: Kombinézy na zoskoky padákom; Krídelné kombinézy na zoskok
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Závěsné létání a parašutismus > Létací obleky: Parašutistické kombinézy; Wingsuity
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 悬挂式滑翔/跳伞 > 空中运动飞行服: 跳伞服; 翼装
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 행글라이딩/스카이다이빙 > 에어슈트: 스카이다이빙 점프슈트; 윙슈트
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 懸掛式滑翔/跳傘 > 跳傘服裝: 跳傘連身服; 翼裝
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Deltaplane et parachutisme > Combinaisons pour sports aériens: Combinaisons de parachutisme; Combinaisons de wingsuit
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jadralno zmajarstvo in padalstvo > Letalni kombinezoni: Padalski kombinezoni; Krilne obleke za letenje
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Riippuliito ja laskuvarjohyppy > Laskuvarjohyppypuvut: Laskuvarjohyppypuvut; Liitopuvut
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ร่มร่อนและการเหินเวหา > แอร์สูท: ชุดกระโดดร่ม; ชุดวิงสูท
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ala delta y paracaidismo > Monos de salto: Monos de paracaidismo; Trajes aéreos
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Paracadutismo e volo libero > Tute da paracadutismo: Tute da paracadutismo; Tute alari
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Drachenfliegen & Fallschirmspringen > Fluganzüge: Fallschirmsprunganzüge; Wingsuits
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Дельтапланеризм и прыжки с парашютом > Парашютные комбинезоны: Комбинезоны для парашютного спорта; Вингсьюты